Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4656.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [299A.94] ASSISTANCE WITH RETURN TO MINNESOTA FOR CERTAIN PERSONS REMOVED FOR ALLEGED IMMIGRATION LAW VIOLATIONS. new text end new text begin (a) A person who was removed from Minnesota to another state or country by the federal government or an agent of the federal government due to an alleged immigration law violation and subsequently released from detention but not provided transportation back to Minnesota may contact the Department of Public Safety to receive assistance in returning if the person is legally free to return. The person may contact the department directly or another person may contact the department on the person's behalf. new text end new text begin (b) Upon receiving a request under paragraph (a), the commissioner shall arrange transportation back to Minnesota at the commissioner's expense or, if more practicable and convenient to the person seeking return, reimburse the person for the person's reasonable expenses incurred to return to Minnesota. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner shall establish guidelines to allow persons to request assistance under paragraph (a) but shall accept and seek to assist with any reasonable request for assistance. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety to reimburse the department for costs associated with section 1. new text end